Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.33.070

Budget—Hearing.

The council shall meet on the day fixed by RCW 35A.33.060 for the purpose of fixing the final budget of the city at the time and place designated in the notice thereof. Any taxpayer may appear and be heard for or against any part of the budget. The hearing may be continued from day to day but not later than the twenty-fifth day prior to commencement of the city's fiscal year.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.33.070.]